Washington statutes.
RCW 19.142.090

Waivers of this chapter—Contracts not in compliance with this chapter—Void and unenforceable.

A health studio shall not request a buyer to waive any provision of this chapter. Any contract for health studio services which does not comply with the provisions of this chapter or in which a buyer waives any provision of this chapter is void and unenforceable as contrary to public policy.

[ 1987 c 317 s 10.]